Florida, session 2026, SB78.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âHome hardening products; sales tax refund.â 22 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 23 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Revenue. 24 (b)ââEligible residential propertyâ means a residential 25 property with a site-built dwelling for which a homestead 26 exemption has been granted under s. 196.031, Florida Statutes, 27 and which has a just value of $700,000 or less. 28 (c)ââHome hardening productâ means an impact-resistant 29 door, an impact-resistant garage door, or an impact-resistant 30 window. 31 (d)ââImpact-resistant doorâ means an exterior door system 32 designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces which is 33 rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in accordance with 34 any of the following most recent sets of test methods, 35 standards, and specifications: 36 1.âASTM International E1886 and E1996; 37 2.âAmerican Architectural Manufacturers Association 506; or 38 3.âFlorida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS 39 201, TAS 202, and TAS 203. 40 (e)ââImpact-resistant garage doorâ means a garage door 41 system designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces 42 which is rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in 43 accordance with any of the following most recent sets of test 44 methods, standards, and specifications: 45 1.âASTM International E1886 and E1996; 46 2.âAmerican Architectural Manufacturers Association 506; 47 3.âFlorida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS 48 201, TAS 202, TAS 203; or 49 4.âANSI/DASMA 115. 50 (f)ââImpact-resistant windowâ means a window that is 51 laminated or has been treated with a polycarbonate glazing 52 system designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces 53 which is rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in 54 accordance with any of the following most recent sets of test 55 methods, standards, and specifications: 56 1.âASTM International E1886 and E1996; 57 2.âAmerican Architectural Manufacturers Association 506; or 58 3.âFlorida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS 59 201, TAS 202, and TAS 203. 60 (g)ââOwnerâ means a person who holds the legal title to an 61 eligible residential property. 62 (h)ââPurchase periodâ means retail purchases made during 63 the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028. 64 (i)ââSite-built dwellingâ means a dwelling constructed at 65 its permanent location. Site-built dwellings do not include 66 mobile homes, manufactured homes, trailers, or any home or 67 trailer that may be titled or registered in accordance with 68 chapter 319, Florida Statutes, or chapter 320, Florida Statutes. 69 (2)âHome hardening products used on eligible residential 70 property are exempt from the tax imposed by chapter 212, Florida 71 Statutes, upon an affirmative showing to the satisfaction of the 72 department that the requirements of this section have been met, 73 in an amount up to $500 per eligible residential property for 74 purchases made during the purchase period. This exemption inures 75 to the owner through a refund of previously paid taxes. To be 76 eligible to receive a refund, an owner must submit an 77 application to the department on a form approved by the 78 department which includes all of the following: 79 (a)âThe name and address of the owner claiming the refund. 80 (b)âThe address and assessment roll parcel number of the 81 eligible residential property for which a refund of previously 82 paid taxes is being sought. 83 (c)âA sworn statement, submitted under penalty of perjury, 84 from the owner which specifies the actual cost of the exempt 85 home hardening products, the amount of sales tax paid in this 86 state on the exempt home hardening products, and that the 87 property is an eligible residential property. Copies of receipts 88 evidencing payment of sales tax must be attached to the form. 89 (3)âThe owner may submit an application for only one 90 eligible residential property. 91 (4)âThe owner must submit the refund application to the 92 department between July 1, 2026, and June 30, 2028. Within 30 93 business days after receipt of the refund application, the 94 department must determine if the application meets the 95 requirements of this section. The department must issue a refund 96 within 30 business days after it formally approves the 97 application. 98 (5)âThe department is authorized, and all conditions are 99 deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4), 100 Florida Statutes, for the purpose of implementing this section. 101 Notwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted under 102 this subsection are effective for the length of the exemption 103 period and may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to 104 adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency 105 rules. 106 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.